California, session 20252026, SB842.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Firm zero-carbon resources, which include renewable resources that can, along with other resources, provide nonemitting firm dispatchable capacity, are essential to advancing California’s clean energy goals and ensuring a reliable, resilient, and affordable electricity system, including in the face of growing challenges posed by extended weather events and wildfire risks.(b) Firm zero-carbon resources are not fully represented or valued in the state’s energy planning processes or market rules, which may lead to suboptimal energy and cost outcomes.(c) Enabling the widest array of clean energy resources, including firm zero-carbon resources, to participate in the state’s energy markets as soon as possible will maximize competition and innovation, and deliver the most affordable energy outcomes for California ratepayers.SEC. 2. Section 380.6 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:380.6. (a) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1) “Firm zero-carbon resources” has the same meaning as defined in Section 25216.7 of the Public Resources Code.(2) “Long term,” “midterm,” and “short term” have the same meanings as defined in Section 454.52.(b) On or before December 31, 2026, in consultation with the Independent System Operator, the commission shall produce a report identifying opportunities and needs to provide for local and system reliability with firm zero-carbon resources over the short term, midterm, and long term.(c) The report produced pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include all of the following:(1) Characterization of the resource attributes vital for local and system reliability, and identification of firm zero-carbon resources capable of providing those attributes.(2) Development of scenarios identifying the scale of firm zero-carbon resource needs to provide local and system reliability over the short term, midterm, and long term, accounting for economic retirements of available infrastructure and based on reliability needs.(3) Identification of priority regions for deploying firm zero-carbon resources to provide local and system reliability over the short term and midterm, based on the scenarios and considerations identified in paragraph (2).(4) Identification of barriers, including market barriers, to deploying firm zero-carbon resources to enhance local and system reliability.(5) Identification of solutions to overcome barriers identified in paragraph (4), including potential changes to market products or new services that may be required—such as multiday firm capacity products, flexible ramping products, or other firm energy supply obligations that could incentivize the long-term development of firm zero-carbon resources needed to meet the state’s energy goals and achieve the outcomes of this section.(6) Identification of implementation timelines, regulatory processes, or stakeholder engagement steps required to adopt those changes.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.